Hawaii statutes.
§195D-6 Rules. The department may
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. [L 1975, c 65, pt of §1; am L 1983, c 111, §7; am L 1997, c 380, §6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next